Utah statutes.
63I-3-205.   Public hearings -- Purpose.

The commission may hold public hearings that it considers advisable and in locations within the state that it chooses in order to afford any interested person who is a citizen of this state an opportunity to appear and present views in respect to any subject relating to the work of the commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

